Utah, session 2026, HB121.
Section 1. Section 53G-7-501 is amended to read:53G-7-501. Definitions.As used in this part:(1)(a)"Common education expense" means an expense an LEA incurs that is related to the delivery of instruction for all courses, unrelated to a specific course, program, or activity.(b)"Common education expense" includes the employment of educators and staff, the provision of capital facilities, and operation and maintenance costs.(2)(a)"Course" means an activity, a course, or a program that an LEA:(i)intends to deliver instruction;(ii)provides, sponsors, or supports; and(iii)conducts primarily during school hours.(b)"Course" includes a course in which a student is required to enroll as a condition of participation in a separate extracurricular activity.(3)"Discretionary project" means a project that a student completes in lieu of or in addition to a required classroom project in accordance with Section 53G-7-503.(4)"Elementary school" means a school that provides instruction to students in grades kindergarten, 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, or 6.(5)(a)"Elementary school student" means a student enrolled in an elementary school.(b)"Elementary school student" does not include a secondary school student.(6)(a)"Extracurricular activity" means an activity or a program that:(i)is not a course; and(ii)an LEA provides, sponsors, or supports.(b)"Extracurricular activity" does not include a noncurricular club as defined in Section 53G-7-701.(7)(a)"Fee" means a charge, expense, deposit, rental, or payment:(i)regardless of how an LEA terms, describes, requests, or requires the charge, expense, deposit, rental, or payment, directly or indirectly;(ii)in the form of money, goods, or services; and(iii)that is a condition to a student's full participation in or admission to an activity, course, or program that an LEA provides, sponsors, or supports.(b)"Fee" includes:(i)payments to a third party that provides a part of a school activity, class, or program; and(ii)a fine other than a fine described in Subsection (7)(c)(i).(c)"Fee" does not include:(i)a student fine that an LEA approves for:(A)failing to return school property;(B)losing, wasting, or damaging private or school property through intentional, careless, or irresponsible behavior, including defacing or damaging school property as described in Section 53G-8-212; or(C)improper use of school property, including a parking violation;(ii)a payment for school breakfast or lunch;(iii)a deposit that:(A)is a pledge securing the return of school property; and(B)the LEA or school refunds upon the return of the school property;(iv)a charge for insurance, unless the insurance is required for a student to participate in an activity, course, or program; or(v)money or another item of monetary value that a student or the student's family raises through fundraising.(8)"Fee course" means a course that is not a non-fee course.(9)(a)"Fundraising" means an activity or event that:(i)an LEA provides, sponsors, or supports; and(ii)uses students to generate funds or raise money to:(A)provide financial support to a school or a school's class, group, team, or program; or(B)benefit a particular charity or for other charitable purposes.(b)"Fundraising" does not include an alternative method of raising revenue without students.(10)(a)"Instructional equipment" means an activity-, course-, or program-related tool that:(i)a student is required to use as part of an activity, course, or program in a secondary school; and(ii)becomes the property of the student upon exiting the activity, course, or program.(b)"Instructional equipment" does not include: (i)school equipment;(ii)an instructional supply; or(iii)a personal student supply for a secondary student.(11)(a)"Instructional supply" means a non-reusable or a consumable material or supply that is necessary to use, expend, or deplete as a component or element of an activity, course, or program in a secondary school.(b)"Instructional supply" does not include a personal student supply for a secondary student.(12)"Non-fee course" means a course that results in course credit or a course grade within the core standards the state board establishes under Section 53E-4-202 and other statutory requirements for:(a)English language arts;(b)health education;(c)mathematics; and(d)science; and(e)(d)social studies.(13)(a)"Personal student supply" means, for a secondary student, an object, tool, material, or supply that:(i)is the personal property of the student;(ii)regardless of the use of the supply in the instructional process, individuals not enrolled in the course or activity also commonly purchase and use; and(iii)has a high probability of regular use in activities other than school-sponsored activities.(b)"Personal student supply" includes pencils, papers, notebooks, crayons, scissors, and basic clothing.(14)(a)"School activity clothing" means special shoes or items of clothing that:(i)meet specific requirements, including requesting a specific brand, fabric, or imprint;(ii)a school requires a student to provide and to wear for an activity-, course-, or program-related activity; and(iii)(A)the student rents while participating in the activity; or(B)become the property of the student upon exiting the activity, course, or program.(b)"School activity clothing" does not include:(i)a school uniform; or(ii)clothing that is commonly found in students' homes.(15)"School equipment" means a machine, equipment, facility, or tool that:(a)is durable;(b)is reusable;(c)a secondary school owns; and(d)a student uses as part of an activity, course, or program in a secondary school.(16)(a)"School uniform" means special shoes or an item of clothing that:(i)(A)meets specific requirements, including a requested specific color, style, fabric, or imprint; and(B)a school requires a student to provide and wear during school attendance; and(ii)is the property of the student.(b)"School uniform" does not include school activity clothing.(17)"Secondary school" means a school that provides instruction to students in grades 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, or 12.(18)"Secondary school student":(a)means a student enrolled in a secondary school; and(b)includes a student in grade 6 if the student attends a secondary school.(19)(a)"Textbook" means instructional material necessary for participation in an activity, course, or program, regardless of the format of the material.(b)"Textbook" includes:(i)a hardcopy book or printed pages of instructional material, including a consumable workbook; or(ii)computer hardware, software, or digital content.(c)"Textbook" does not include school equipment, instructional equipment, or instructional supplies.(20)"Waiver" means a full release from: (a)a requirement to pay a fee; and(b)any provision in lieu of fee payment.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on July 1, 2026.